District of Columbia statutes.
11-1909

Deferral from jury service.

A qualified prospective juror may be deferred from jury service only upon a showing of undue hardship, extreme inconvenience, public necessity, or temporary physical or mental disability which would affect service as a juror. The procedure for requesting a deferral from jury service and the procedure and basis for granting a deferral shall be set forth in the master jury plan.

History

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2

Section References

This section is referenced in § 11-1908.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1909.

Short Title

Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.